Utah statutes.
75-2-1203.   Validity of nonvested property interest -- Validity of general power of appointment subject to a condition precedent -- Validity of nongeneral or testamentary power of appointment -- Effect of certain "later-of" type language.

(1)  A nonvested property interest is invalid unless within 1,000 years after the interest's creation the interest vests or terminates.

(2)  A general power of appointment not presently exercisable because of a condition precedent is invalid unless within 1,000 years after the general power of appointment's creation the power of appointment is irrevocably exercised or terminates.

(3)  A nongeneral power of appointment or a general testamentary power of appointment is invalid unless within 1,000 years after its creation the power of appointment is irrevocably exercised or terminates.

(4)  The language in a governing instrument is inoperative to the extent it produces a period of time that exceeds 21 years after the death of the survivor of the specified lives, if, in measuring a period from the creation of a trust or other property arrangement, the language:

(a)  seeks to disallow the vesting or termination of any interest or trust beyond;

(b)  seeks to postpone the vesting or termination of any interest or trust until; or

(c)  seeks to operate in effect in any similar fashion upon, the later of:

(i)  the expiration of a period of time not exceeding 21 years after the death of the survivor of specified lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement; or

(ii)  the expiration of a period of time that exceeds or might exceed 21 years after the death of the survivor of lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement.

(5)  If a nongeneral power of appointment is exercised to create a new presently exercisable general power of appointment, all property interests subject to that new presently exercisable general power of appointment are invalid unless, within 1,000 years after the creation of the new presently exercisable general power of appointment, the property interests that are subject to the new presently exercisable general power of appointment vest or terminate.

(6)  If a nongeneral power of appointment is exercised to create a new or successive nongeneral power of appointment or a new or successive testamentary general power of appointment, all property interests subject to the exercise of that new or successive nongeneral or testamentary general power of appointment are invalid unless, within 1,000 years from the time of creation of the original instrument or conveyance creating the original nongeneral power of appointment that is exercised to create a new or successive nongeneral or testamentary general power of appointment, the property interests that are subject to the new or successive nongeneral or testamentary general power of appointment vest or terminate.

